North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-63 Indian Scholarships

15-63-01.
State board for Indian scholarships.

There is hereby established a state board for Indian scholarships consisting of an Indian appointed by the governor, the executive director of the state Indian affairs commission, and the commissioner of higher education or the commissioner’s designee. The commissioner of higher education or the commissioner’s designee shall serve as chairperson and the executive director of the state Indian affairs commission shall serve as secretary of the board for Indian scholarships. The state board of higher education shall request scholarship funds and staff to administer the Indian scholarship program in the board’s biennial budget request.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 178, § 1; 1969, ch. 187, § 1; 1971, ch. 204, § 1; 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1991, ch. 602, § 1.

15-63-02.
Duties of board.

The state board for Indian scholarships shall:

Award scholarship grants as provided in this chapter.

Make necessary rules and establish standards, requirements, and procedures for the administration of this chapter.

Encourage members of Indian tribes to attend and be graduated from any institution of higher learning or state career and technical education program within this state, and to make application for scholarships.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 178, § 2; 1979, ch. 270, § 2; 1997, ch. 186, § 1; 2003, ch. 138, § 43.

15-63-03.
Number and nature of scholarships.

The state board for Indian scholarships shall provide scholarships each year for resident members of federally recognized Indian tribes to entitle persons so selected to enter and attend any institution of higher learning or state career and technical education program within this state upon compliance with all requirements for admission and to pursue any course or courses offered in such institutions or programs.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 178, § 3; 1967, ch. 153, § 1; 1969, ch. 187, § 2; 1973, ch. 174, § 1; 1997, ch. 186, § 2; 2003, ch. 138, § 44.

15-63-04.
Eligibility of candidates — Determination.

The initial and continuing scholarship eligibility of state residents who are enrolled members of federally recognized Indian tribes must be determined by the state board for Indian scholarships after the candidate has gained admission to any institution of higher learning or state career and technical education program within this state and has had this fact certified to the board. Factors to be considered in the award of these scholarships are the candidate’s financial need and probable and continuing success as a student.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 178, § 4; 1969, ch. 187, § 3; 1979, ch. 270, § 3; 1997, ch. 186, § 3; 2003, ch. 138, § 45.

15-63-05.
Scholarship payments — Conditions.

Upon the granting of a scholarship and acceptance thereof, the recipient is eligible for a credit in fees in the enrolling institution of higher learning or state career and technical education program to apply toward the cost of registration, health, activities, board, books, and other necessary items of not to exceed six hundred sixty-seven dollars per quarter for three quarters, or one thousand dollars per semester for two semesters, in any academic year. The board for Indian scholarships may reduce the amount of any scholarship to accord with individual financial need or funds available. After the enrolling institution or program has deducted the amount due such institution, the remaining balance must be given to the recipient for necessary expenses during the quarter or semester. At the beginning of each quarter or semester of a regular academic year, the board for Indian scholarships shall certify to the director of the office of management and budget the name of each recipient and the amount payable, and the director of the office of management and budget shall issue a warrant to the state treasurer who shall pay the amount of the scholarship to the institution of higher learning or state career and technical education program in which the recipient is enrolled. Renewal of the scholarship award is subject to the maintenance of a minimum grade average of “C” in the courses taken.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 178, § 5; 1967, ch. 153, § 2; 1971, ch. 204, § 2; 1973, ch. 174, § 2; 1977, ch. 186, § 1; 1979, ch. 270, § 4; 2003, ch. 138, § 46.

15-63-06.
Unused scholarships. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 174, § 3.

15-63-07.
Scholarship refunds — Use.

Any Indian scholarship refunds which are made must be credited to the appropriation for the biennium in which such refunds are received and may be awarded as additional scholarships in that biennium. Any amounts remaining in the appropriation at the end of any biennium must be canceled pursuant to section 54-44.1-11.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 187, § 1.